Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 39 Title to Dies, Molds, and Forms

6-39-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Customer” means any individual or entity:

Who causes or caused a molder to fabricate, cast, or otherwise make a die, mold, or form; or

Who causes or caused a molder to use a die, mold, or form to manufacture, assemble, or otherwise make a product or products.

“Molder” means any individual or entity, including, but not limited to, a tool or die maker:

Who fabricates, casts, or otherwise makes a die, mold, or form; or

Who uses a die, mold, or form to manufacture, assemble, or otherwise make a product or products.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 341, § 1.

6-39-2.
Provisions not applicable.

This chapter shall not apply where a molder retains title to and possession of a die, mold, or form. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant a customer any rights, title, or interest to a die, mold, or form.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 341, § 1.

6-39-3.
Title to dies, molds, or forms by operation of law.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing, if a customer does not take possession from the molder of a die, mold, or form in this state within three (3) years following the last prior use of it, all of the customer’s rights, title, and interest to the die, mold, or form may be transferred by operation of law to the molder only for the purpose of destroying the die, mold, or form, consistent with this chapter.

For purposes of this chapter, the phrase “within three (3) years following the last prior use” shall be construed to include any period following the last prior use of a die, mold, or form regardless of whether or not the period precedes November 21, 1981.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 341, § 1.

6-39-4.
Notice required.

If a molder chooses to have all rights, title, and interest to any die, mold, or form transferred to the molder by operation of law, the molder shall send written notice by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the customer at the address, if any, indicated in the agreement pursuant to which the molder obtained possession of the die, mold, or form, and to the customer’s last known address, indicating that the molder intends to terminate all of the customer’s rights, title, and interest by having all rights, title, and interest transferred to the molder by operation of law pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 341, § 1.

6-39-5.
Molder’s rights following notice.

If a customer does not take possession of the particular die, mold, or form within one hundred twenty (120) days following the date the molder receives acknowledgment or non-acknowledgment of the return receipt of the notice, or does not make other contractual arrangements with the molder for taking possession or for the storage of it, all rights, title, and interest of the customer shall transfer by law to the molder only for the purpose of destroying the die, molds, or form consistent with this chapter. After this, the molder shall be entitled to destroy the particular die, mold, or form as the molder’s own property without any risk of liability to the customer, except that this chapter shall not be construed in any manner to affect the right of the customer under federal patent or copyright law, or any state or federal law, pertaining to unfair competition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 341, § 1.